Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.140

Duration of business development company.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the period of duration of a business development company shall be perpetual, subject, however, to the right of the stockholders to dissolve the business development company as provided in RCW 31.24.150.

[ 2006 c 87 s 17; 1963 c 162 s 14.]